Nebraska, session 109, LB872.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB872 LB872
2026 2026
1 Section 1. This act becomes operative for all taxable years
2 beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2026, under the
3 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
4 Sec. 2. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
5 77-2715.08 and 77-2715.09, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-2-